Utah statutes.
20A-4-405.   Election contests -- Costs.
(1)  The court shall enter judgment for costs against the party contesting the
election if:
(a)  the proceedings are dismissed for:
(i)  insufficiency of pleading or proof; or
(ii)  want of prosecution; or
(b)  the election is confirmed by the court.
(2)  The court shall enter judgment for costs against the party whose election
was contested if the election is annulled and set aside.
(3) (a)  Each party is liable for the costs of the officers and witnesses that
appeared on his behalf.
(b)  The party may pay, and the officers and witnesses may collect, those
costs in the same manner as similar costs are paid and collected in other
cases.
